apertium-tr-tt.tr.lexc
!
!!! TV BELOW
!
!LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!
!%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
! aç<t><tv><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
! kulluk e<t><tv><caus_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
! gi<t><tv><caus_ar><aor_ar> 
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
! çık<tv><caus_art><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR
! al<tv><caus_dir>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR  
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
! üş<tv><caus_it>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
! ak<tv><caus_it><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
! bekle<tv><caus_t>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;



LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON POSTINFL

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CCINFL

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CSINFL

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CAINFL

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON PRONPERS

ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ben # ;
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:bana # ;
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:benim # ;
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:beni # ;
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:bende # ;
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:benden # ;
!ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:benimle # ;
!ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:benle # ;

sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:sen # ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:sana # ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:senim # ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:seni # ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:sende # ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:senden # ;
!sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:senimle # ;
!sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:senle # ;

o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:o # ;
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ona # ;
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onun # ;
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:onu # ;
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ondan # ;
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda # ;
!o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:oimle # ;
!o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ole # ;

biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:biz # ;
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bize # ;
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizim # ;
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizi # ;
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizde # ;
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizden # ;
!biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:bizimle # ;
!biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:bizle # ;

siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:siz # ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:size # ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:sizim # ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizi # ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizde # ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizden # ;
!siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:sizimle # ;
!siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:sizle # ;

onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:onlar # ;
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:onlara # ;
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:onların # ;
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:onları # ;
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:onlardan # ;
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlarda # ;
!onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:onlarimle # ;
!onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:onlarle # ;

LEXICON PRONDEM

%<prn%>%<dem%>: CASE-DEM ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASE-DEM ; 

LEXICON PRONITG

%<prn%>%<itg%>: # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>: NINFL-COMMON ; 

!! FIXME: This needs fixing 
LEXICON PRONITG-NERE

%<prn%>%<itg%>:e # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>:e NINFL-COMMON ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:de clit ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:den clit ;  ! Dir/LR


LEXICON PRONIND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: # ; 
%<prn%>%<ind%>: NINFL-COMMON ; 

LEXICON Verbs
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
kap:kap VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "snatch, seize, grab"
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
üş:üş VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kulluk% et:kulluk% e%{t%} VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
üz:üz VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
aş:aş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
burk:burk VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
der:der VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ger:ger VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
geç:geç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
gi:gi VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kaç:kaç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sal:sal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sok:sok VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
tık:tık VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
tırs:tırs VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
yıl:yıl VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şaş:şaş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
aban:aban VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
aldat:aldat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
arıt:arıt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ayart:ayart VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
aşırt:aşırt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dolan:dolan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dımbırdat:dımbırdat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eğrit:eğrit VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
tıkat:tıkat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
anımsa:anımsa VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ağırsa:ağırsa VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
derecele:derecele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dipçikle:dipçikle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
doğra:doğra VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dürümle:dürümle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
emayla:emayla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
esle:esle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eşle:eşle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
frezele:frezele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gerekse:gerekse VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kışkır:kışkır VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kırp:kırp VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "trim"
kucakla:kucakla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "embrace"
kuşat:kuşat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "hedge round"
menet:menet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "preclude"
öğüt:öğüt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "digest"
önemse:önemse VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "care"
paylaş:paylaş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "share"
reddet:reddet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "refuse"
sağla:sağla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "provide"
sars:sars VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "jolt"
seç:seç VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "choose"
sil:sil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "erase, delete"
sıyır:sıyır VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "abrade"
süz:süz VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "filter"
tepele:tepele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "defeat"
tık:tık VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "cram into"
üret:üret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "produce"
yama:yama VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "revamp"
yar:yar VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "split"
yen:yen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "win"
yor:yor VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "ascribe"
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "flow, leak"
alçal:alçal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "lower"
algıla:algıla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "comprehend"
azmet:azmet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "determine"
başvur:başvur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "apply"
bin:bin VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "mount, ride"
birleş:birleş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "unite"
çağla:çağla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "murmur"
çek:çek VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "pull"
çevir:çevir VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "translate"
dal:dal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "dive"
dil:dil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "slice"
doku:doku VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "knit"
dolaş:dolaş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "walk around"
emret:emret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "command"
endişelen:endişelen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "worry about"
ger:ger VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "stretch"
göğüsle:göğüsle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "cope with"
göster:göster VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "show"
haykır:haykır VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "yell"
hisset:hisset VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "feel"
kabullen:kabullen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "confess"
kağıtla:kağıtla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "paper"
kak:kak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "push"
kaybet:kaybet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "lose"
